Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Chapter 14

Chartering of Savings Banks

45-14-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Savings Bank Chartering Act of 1991.”

Acts 1991, ch. 177, § 1.

45-14-102. Objective of chapter.

The objective of this chapter is to facilitate the delivery of credit for home ownership, family and community purposes, and of other financial and related services, through the chartering of depository institutions known as savings banks, which shall conduct their general business strictly as savings banks in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and the regulations issued under this chapter, if any.

Acts 1991, ch. 177, § 2; 1996, ch. 768, § 28.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited that the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

45-14-103. Commissioner of financial institutions — Authority — Savings banks — Authorized activities — Applicable law — Definitions — Deposit insurance.

The commissioner of financial institutions, hereinafter referred to as the “commissioner,” is authorized to provide for the organization, chartering, incorporation, examination, operation, regulation, safety and soundness of savings banks.

A savings bank may organize, convert and engage in acquisitions, mergers, consolidations, share exchanges and purchase of assets and assumption of liabilities, in the same manner as is provided for associations in chapter 3 of this title.

The commissioner may by regulation define any term used in this chapter that is not specifically defined in this chapter.

The provisions of chapter 2 of this title, and the regulations thereunder, that are applicable to commercial banks and related parties regarding insolvency, conservatorship, receivership, the termination of unsafe and unsound practices, and the enforcement of laws, regulations and orders, are likewise applicable to savings banks.

All savings banks chartered under this chapter shall be subject to this chapter and the regulations issued under this chapter, and a foreign depository institution operating in this state that meets the definition of a savings bank under § 3(g) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. § 1813(g)), as in effect as of September 1, 1990, is likewise subject to the act and regulations.

Except where the context requires otherwise, “savings bank,” as used in this chapter, means a depository institution chartered pursuant to this chapter.

The deposits of each savings bank subject to this chapter must be insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation pursuant to the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.

Acts 1991, ch. 177, § 3; 1996, ch. 768, § 29.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited that the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

45-14-104. Deposits — Borrowing and securities — Investments — Issuance of credit cards — Offices — Trust business.

A savings bank may accept deposits that:

May be withdrawn on a demand or other basis;

May be negotiable instruments of the savings bank; and

It may pay interest upon.

A savings bank may borrow, give security, and issue securities, (including capital stock), notes, bonds, debentures and other obligations.

A savings bank may invest in, sell or otherwise deal in the accounts, investments and loans, in the same manner as is provided for associations in chapter 3 of this title, and the regulations issued under that chapter.

A savings banks may:

Issue credit cards, extend credit in connection therewith, and otherwise engage in or participate in credit card operations;

Establish, maintain and close offices, branches, remote service units, automated teller machines and other facilities on the same basis as savings institutions chartered under the laws of this state; and

Carry on a trust business, which may encompass acting as trustee, executor, administrator, guardian or in any other fiduciary capacity, on the same basis, and subject to the same requirements with regard to the business, as may commercial banks, trust companies and other corporations authorized under the laws of this state and the regulations under the laws to carry on the business.

Acts 1991, ch. 177, §§ 4-6; 1996, ch. 768, §§ 30, 31.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

45-14-105. Commissioner — Survey of pertinent laws of other states — Investments and activities — Authorization of investments permissible for federal savings banks — Competitive equality.

The commissioner may survey periodically the laws and regulations governing savings banks chartered under the laws of other states, and that meet the definition of a “savings bank” under § 3(g) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. § 1813(g)), as in effect as of September 1, 1990, and, based upon the best practices of such foreign savings banks, may authorize savings banks to make investments and engage in activities not otherwise permissible under this chapter; provided, that investments and activities authorized under this section may not exceed in the aggregate an amount equal to five percent (5%) of the assets of the savings bank.

The commissioner may authorize savings banks to make any investment or engage in any activity that is permissible for federal savings banks, subject to the same limitations applicable to the federal savings banks, upon the commissioner's determination that, in the absence of the authorization, savings banks chartered under this chapter may be at a significant disadvantage in their ability to compete with other depository institutions.

Subject to reasonable regulation to preserve safety and soundness, the commissioner may authorize a state bank to make any investment or engage in any activity permissible to institutions chartered under this chapter that the commissioner determines to be necessary to preserve the competitive equality between depository institutions.

Acts 1991, ch. 177, § 6; 1996, ch. 768, §§ 32, 33.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

45-14-106. Capital requirements.

Savings banks are subject to the same capital requirements as are commercial banks chartered under the laws of this state.

Acts 1991, ch. 177, § 7.

45-14-107. Loans to single borrower.

Savings banks, with regard to the amount of loans they may make to any single borrower, are subject to the same requirements as are commercial banks chartered under the laws of this state.

Acts 1991, ch. 177, § 8.

45-14-108. Accounting requirements.

Savings banks are subject to the same accounting requirements as are commercial banks chartered under the laws of this state.

Acts 1991, ch. 177, § 9.

45-14-109. Membership in federal home loan bank or federal reserve bank.

Savings banks may obtain, maintain and terminate membership in a federal home loan bank or federal reserve bank, or both, meet all applicable requirements for membership, and engage in all acts incidental to membership, unless the acts are specifically prohibited by this chapter or regulations issued under this chapter.

Acts 1991, ch. 177, § 10.

45-14-110. Conversion to savings bank — Compliance with requirements of chapter.

A depository institution that converts to a savings bank pursuant to this chapter shall have a period of time that the commissioner determines to be reasonable and prudent to conform to the requirements of this chapter and the regulations issued under this chapter, but the period shall not exceed ten (10) years from the date of conversion.

Acts 1991, ch. 177, § 11; 1996, ch. 768, § 34.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

45-14-111. Costs, fees and assessments.

Savings banks shall pay the costs, fees and assessments computed in the manner provided for commercial banks (but not for nondepository trust companies) in §45-1-118.

Acts 1991, ch. 177, § 12.

45-14-112. Revocation of charter — Grounds.

The commissioner may revoke any savings bank charter issued under this chapter if the commissioner finds, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, that the savings bank willfully and consistently has been conducting its business in a manner that is substantially and materially inconsistent with the objective of this chapter, or if in violation of this chapter or any regulations promulgated thereunder.

The commissioner shall revoke any savings bank charter issued under this chapter if the commissioner finds, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, that the savings bank is violating § 45-14-103(g).

The commissioner shall issue regulations providing for the voluntary surrender of savings bank charters issued under this chapter.

Acts 1991, ch. 177, § 13.

45-14-113. Commissioner — Regulations.

The commissioner has the power to establish regulations to:

Carry out the legislative purposes of this chapter;

Provide for the safe and sound operation of state-chartered savings banks; and

Establish from time to time reasonable fees for various applications made to the commissioner.

This chapter shall take effect whether or not the commissioner has promulgated regulations to carry out various provisions of the chapter. In the absence of regulations promulgated under this chapter, regulations promulgated under the commissioner's authority granted by this title shall be deemed effective for savings banks until and unless regulations are promulgated specifically under this chapter.

Acts 1991, ch. 177, § 14.

45-14-114. Void and null charters and certificates of authority.

Any charter issued under this chapter shall be null and void if:

The institution for which the charter was issued does not commence operations within five (5) years of the date the charter was issued; provided, that the commissioner may act to extend the time to allow the commencement of operations; or

An institution that is chartered and commences business ceases to conduct business and no operations or business are conducted for a period of five (5) years.

Any certificate of authority issued under this chapter shall be null and void if substantially all of the assets of a savings bank are acquired without acquiring the charter.

Acts 1991, ch. 177, § 16; 2001, ch. 54, § 32.